dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="betr/inken__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>inken</l>   <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>unken</l>   <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>inkend</l>  <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ink</l>     <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>inkt</l>    <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>inke</l>    <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>inkst</l>   <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>inkt</l>    <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>inken</l>   <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>inkt</l>    <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>inken</l>   <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ankst</l>   <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>anken</l>   <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ankt</l>    <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>anken</l>   <r>inken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bew/eisen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>eisen</l>   <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iesen</l>   <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eisend</l>  <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eis</l>     <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eist</l>    <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eise</l>    <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eist</l>    <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eist</l>    <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eisen</l>   <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eist</l>    <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eisen</l>   <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ies</l>     <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iest</l>    <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ies</l>     <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iesen</l>   <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iest</l>    <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iesen</l>   <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bew/erben__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>erben</l>   <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>orben</l>   <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erbend</l>  <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>irb</l>     <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erbt</l>    <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erbe</l>    <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>irbst</l>   <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>irbt</l>    <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erben</l>   <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erbt</l>    <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erben</l>   <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>arb</l>     <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>arbst</l>   <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>arb</l>     <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>arben</l>   <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>arbt</l>    <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>arben</l>   <r>erben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bez/iehen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehen</l>   <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogen</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehend</l>  <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieh</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieht</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehe</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehst</l>   <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieht</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehen</l>   <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieht</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehen</l>   <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>og</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogst</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>og</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogen</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogt</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogen</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="austrinken"><i>austr</i><par n="betr/inken__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="betrinken"><i>betr</i><par n="betr/inken__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beweisen"><i>bew</i><par n="bew/eisen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beziehen"><i>bez</i><par n="bez/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="einbeziehen"><i>einbez</i><par n="bez/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="entziehen"><i>entz</i><par n="bez/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ertrinken"><i>ertr</i><par n="betr/inken__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erweisen"><i>erw</i><par n="bew/eisen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erziehen"><i>erz</i><par n="bez/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="überweisen"><i>überw</i><par n="bew/eisen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="unterziehen"><i>unterz</i><par n="bez/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verweisen"><i>verw</i><par n="bew/eisen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verziehen"><i>verz</i><par n="bez/iehen__vblex"/></e>
